Ohio, session 136, HB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5.2322 and 5.2323 of the Revised 6
Code be enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 5.2322. The month of June is designated as "Male 8
Wellness Month" to promote prostate exams, colonoscopies, and 9
mental health screenings among rural, urban, and suburban males. 10
Sec. 5.2323. (A) The third Monday of June is designated a s 11
"Take Your Dad to the Doctor and Dentist Day," also to be known 12
as "DAD Day." 13
(B) The department of health shall create a poster 14
promoting "Take Your Dad to the Doctor and Dentist Day" that 15

Sub. H. B. No. 207 Page 2
As Passed by the House
shall be publicly accessible for download on the department's 16
web site. 17
(C) The department and each board of health of a city or 18
general health district or the authority having the duties of a 19
board of health under section 3709.05 of the Revised Code shall 20
promote "Take Your Dad to the Doctor and Dentist Day" by 21
displaying the poster described in division (B) of this section 22
on their respective web sites and in the areas over which the 23
department, board, or authority has jurisdiction. 24
Section 2. This act shall be known as the Male Wellness 25
Month Act. 26